Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-6,382
Farm equipment dealers; farm equipment
haulers act as representative; conditions; signed statement; contents.

Farm equipment dealers may
allow farm equipment haulers to act as their representative when hauling farm
equipment to or from the dealer's place of business. Farm equipment haulers
shall carry in the motor vehicle hauling the farm equipment a signed statement
from the farm equipment dealer stating that they are acting as a representative
of the farm equipment dealer. The statement shall be dated and valid for ninety
days and shall be subject to inspection by any peace officer. The statement
shall indicate the name of the farm equipment dealer, the name of the hauler,
and that the dealer authorizes the hauler to act as its representative for
purposes of complying with width, height, and length limitations. Nothing
in this section shall require farm equipment dealers to provide insurance
coverage for farm equipment haulers.

Laws 2014, LB1039, § 2.